Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1657
New or modified dam; owner; filing requirements; approval to operate; issuance.

(1) Upon completion of a new or reconstructed dam and reservoir or of the enlargement of a dam and reservoir, the owner shall file with the Chief Water Officer, without a filing fee, a completion certification accompanied by supplementary drawings or descriptive matter signed and sealed by the design engineer, showing or describing the work as actually completed. Such supplementary materials may include, but need not be limited to, the following as determined by the Chief Water Officer:

(a) A record of all geological boreholes and grout holes and grouting;

(b) A record of permanent location points, benchmarks, and instruments embedded in the structure;

(c) A record of tests of concrete or other material used in the construction, reconstruction, or enlargement of the dam; and

(d) A record of initial seepage flows and embedded instrument readings.

(2) In connection with the enlargement of a dam, the supplementary drawings and descriptive matter need apply only to the new work.

(3) An approval to operate shall be issued by the Chief Water Officer upon a finding by the Chief Water Officer that the dam is safe to impound within the limitations prescribed in the application approval. No impoundment by the structure shall occur prior to issuance of the approval to operate.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 57;

Laws 2017, LB154, § 1;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 295.